California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(A) Managed care plan performance measures shall be integrated and coordinated with the Healthy Families Program performance standards including, but not limited to, child-only Healthcare Effectiveness Data and Information Set (HEDIS) measures, and measures indicative of performance in serving children and adolescents. These performance measures shall also be in compliance with all performance requirements under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) and existing Medi-Cal managed care performance measurements and standards as set forth in this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section
 14200), and all-plan letters, including, but not limited to, network adequacy and linguistic services, and shall be met prior to the transition of individuals pursuant to Phase 1.

(B) Medi-Cal managed care health plans shall allow enrollees to remain with their current primary care provider. If an individual does not remain with the current primary care provider, the plan shall report to the department as to how continuity of care is being provided.

(4) (A) As individuals are transitioned pursuant to subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (1), for individuals residing in all counties except the Counties of Sacramento and Los Angeles, their dental coverage shall transition to fee-for-service dental coverage and may be provided by their current provider if the provider is a Medi-Cal fee-for-service dental
 provider.

(B) For individuals residing in the County of Sacramento, their dental coverage shall continue to be provided by their current dental managed care plan if their plan is a Medi-Cal dental managed care plan. If their plan is not a Medi-Cal dental managed care plan, they shall select a Medi-Cal dental managed care plan. If they do not choose a Medi-Cal dental managed care plan, they shall be assigned to a plan with preference to a plan with which their current provider is a contracted provider. Any children in the Healthy Families Program transitioned into Medi-Cal dental managed care plans shall also have access to the beneficiary dental exception process, pursuant to Section 14089.09. Further, the Sacramento advisory committee, established pursuant to Section 14089.08, shall be consulted regarding the transition of children in the Healthy Families Program into Medi-Cal dental managed care plans.

(C) (i) For individuals residing in the County of Los Angeles, for purposes of continuity of care, their dental coverage shall continue to be provided by their current dental managed care plan if that plan is a Medi-Cal dental managed care plan. If their plan is not a Medi-Cal dental managed care plan, they may select a Medi-Cal dental managed care plan or choose to move into Medi-Cal fee-for-service dental coverage.

(ii) It is the intent of the Legislature that children transitioning to Medi-Cal under this section have a choice in dental coverage, as provided under existing law.

(5) Dental health plan performance measures and benchmarks shall be in accordance with Section 14459.6.

(6) Medi-Cal managed care health and dental plans
 shall report to the department, as frequently as specified by the department, specified information pertaining to transition implementation, enrollees, and providers, including, but not limited to, grievances related to access to care, continuity of care requests and outcomes, and changes to provider networks, including provider enrollment and disenrollment changes. The plans shall report this information by county, and in the format requested by the department.

(7) The department may develop supplemental implementation plans to separately account for the transition of individuals from the Healthy Families Program to specific Medi-Cal delivery systems.

(8) The department shall consult with the Legislature and stakeholders, including, but not limited to, consumers, families, consumer advocates, counties, providers, and health and dental plans, in the development of implementation
 plans described in paragraph (3) for individuals who are transitioned to Medi-Cal in Phase 2, Phase 3, and Phase 4, as described in subparagraphs (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (1).

(9) (A) The department shall consult and collaborate with the Department of Managed Health Care in assessing Medi-Cal managed care health plan network adequacy in accordance with the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) for purposes of the developed transition plans pursuant to paragraph (2) for each of the phases.

(B) For purposes of individuals transitioning in Phase 1, as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), network adequacy shall be assessed as described in this paragraph and findings from this assessment shall be provided to the fiscal and appropriate policy
 committees of the Legislature 60 days prior to the effective date of implementing this transition.

(f) (1) The department and MRMIB shall work collaboratively in the development of notices for individuals transitioned pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e).

(2) The state shall provide written notice to individuals enrolled in the Healthy Families Program of their transition to the Medi-Cal program at least 60 days prior to the transition of individuals in Phase 1, as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), and at least 90 days prior to transition of individuals in Phases 2, 3, and 4, as described in subparagraphs (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e).

(3) Notices developed pursuant to this subdivision shall ensure individuals are informed regarding the transition, including, but not limited to, how individuals’ systems of care may change, when the changes will occur, and whom they can contact for assistance when choosing
 a Medi-Cal managed care plan, if applicable, including a toll-free telephone number, and with problems they may encounter. The department shall consult with stakeholders regarding notices developed pursuant to this subdivision. These notices shall be developed using plain language, and written translation of the notices shall be available for those who are limited English proficient or non-English speaking in all Medi-Cal threshold languages.

(4) The department shall designate department liaisons responsible for the coordination of the Healthy Families Program and may establish a children’s-focused section for this purpose and to facilitate the provision of health care services for children enrolled in Medi-Cal.

(5) The department shall provide a process for ongoing stakeholder consultation and make information publicly available, including the achievement of benchmarks,
 enrollment data, utilization data, and quality measures.

(g) (1) In order to aid the transition of Healthy Families Program enrollees, MRMIB, on the effective date of the act that added this section and continuing through the completion of the transition of Healthy Families Program enrollees to the Medi-Cal program, shall begin requesting and collecting from health plans contracting with MRMIB pursuant to Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, information about each health plan’s provider network, including, but not limited to, the primary care and all specialty care providers assigned to individuals enrolled in the health plan. MRMIB shall obtain this information in a manner that coincides with the transition activities described in subdivision (d), and shall provide all of the collected information to the department within 60 days of the department’s request for this information to
 ensure timely transitions of Healthy Families Program enrollees.

(2) The department shall analyze the existing Healthy Families Program delivery system network and the Medi-Cal fee-for-service provider networks, including, but not limited to, Medi-Cal dental providers, to determine overlaps of the provider networks in each county for which there are no Medi-Cal managed care plans or dental managed care plans. To the extent there is a lack of existing Medi-Cal fee-for-service providers available to serve the Healthy Families Program enrollees, the department shall work with the Healthy Families Program provider community to encourage participation of those providers in the Medi-Cal program, and develop a streamlined process to enroll them as Medi-Cal providers.

(3) (A) MRMIB, within 60 days of a request by the department, shall provide the department any data,
 information, or record concerning the Healthy Families Program as is necessary to implement the transition of enrollment required pursuant to this section.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, all of the following shall apply:

(i) The term “data, information, or record” shall include, but is not limited to, personal information as defined in Section 1798.3 of the Civil Code.

(ii) Any data, information, or record shall be exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and any other law, to the same extent that it was exempt from disclosure or privileged prior to the provision of the data, information, or record to the department.

(iii) The provision of this
 data, information, or record to the department shall not constitute a waiver of any evidentiary privilege or exemption from disclosure.

(iv) The department shall keep all data, information, or records provided by MRMIB confidential to the full extent permitted by law, including, but not limited to, the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), and consistent with MRMIB’s contractual obligations to keep the data, information, or records confidential.

(h) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that all necessary federal approvals and waivers have been obtained and the enhanced rate of federal financial participation under Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.) is available for targeted low-income children pursuant to that act.

(i) (1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the department shall exercise the option pursuant to Section 1916A of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396o-1) to impose premiums for individuals described in subdivision (a) of Section 14005.26 whose family income has been determined to be above 150 percent and up to and including 200 percent of the federal poverty level, after application of the income disregard pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14005.26. The department shall not impose premiums under this subdivision for individuals described in subdivision (a) of Section 14005.26 whose family income has been determined to be at or below 150 percent of the federal poverty level, after application of the income disregard pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14005.26. The department shall obtain federal approval for the implementation of this
 subdivision.

(B) Effective January 1, 2014, the family income range for the imposition of premiums pursuant to subparagraph (A) for individuals described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 14005.26 shall be above 160 percent and shall go up to and include 261 percent of the federal poverty level as determined, counted, and valued in accordance with the requirements of Section 14005.64. The department shall not impose premiums for eligible individuals whose family income has been determined to be at or below 160 percent of the federal poverty level.

(2) All premiums imposed under this section shall equal the family contributions described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 12693.43 of the Insurance Code and shall be reduced in conformity with subdivisions (e) and (f) of Section 12693.43 of the Insurance Code.

(j) The department shall not enroll targeted low-income children described in this section in the Medi-Cal program until all necessary federal approvals and waivers have been obtained, or no sooner than January 1, 2013.

(k) (1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), to the extent the new budget methodology pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 14154 is not fully operational, for the purposes of implementing this section, for individuals described in subdivision (a) whose family income has been determined to be at or below 150 percent of the federal poverty level, after application of the disregard pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14005.26, the department shall utilize the budgeting methodology for this population as contained in the November 2011 Medi-Cal Local Assistance Estimate for Medi-Cal county administration costs for eligibility
 operations.

(B) Effective January 1, 2014, the federal poverty level percentage used under subparagraph (A) for individuals described in subdivision (a) shall equal 160 percent of the federal poverty level as determined, counted, and valued in accordance with the requirements of Section 14005.64.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), for purposes of implementing this section, the department shall include in the Medi-Cal Local Assistance Estimate an amount for Medi-Cal eligibility operations associated with the transfer of Healthy Families Program enrollees eligible pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14005.26 and whose family income is determined to be above 150 percent and up to and including 200 percent of the federal poverty level, after application of the income disregard pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14005.26. In
 developing an estimate for this activity, the department shall consider the projected number of final eligibility determinations each county will process and projected county costs. Within 60 days of the passage of the annual Budget Act, the department shall notify each county of their allocation for this activity based upon the amount allotted in the annual Budget Act for this purpose.

(B) Effective January 1, 2014, for purposes of implementing this section, the department shall include in the Medi-Cal Local Assistance Estimate an amount for Medi-Cal eligibility operations associated with the transfer of Healthy Families Program enrollees eligible pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 14005.26 and whose family income is determined to be above 160 percent and up to and including 261 percent of the federal poverty level.

(l) When the new budget methodology pursuant to
 paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 14154 is fully operational, the new budget methodology shall be utilized to reimburse counties for eligibility determinations made for individuals pursuant to this section.

(m) Except as provided in subdivision (b), eligibility determinations and annual redeterminations made pursuant to this section shall be performed by county eligibility workers.

(n) In conducting the eligibility determinations for individuals pursuant to this section and Section 14005.26, the following reporting and performance standards shall apply to all counties:

(1) Counties shall report to the department, in a manner and for a time period determined by the department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, the number of applications processed on a monthly basis, a breakout of
 the applications based on income using the federal percentage of poverty levels, the final disposition of each application, including information on the approved Medi-Cal program, if applicable, and the average number of days it took to make the final eligibility determination for applications submitted directly to the county and from the single point of entry (SPE).

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the following performance standards shall be applied to counties for eligibility determinations for individuals eligible pursuant to this section:

(A) For children whose applications are received by the county human services department from the SPE, the following standards shall apply:

(i) Applications for children who are granted accelerated enrollment by the SPE shall be processed according to the timeframes specified
 in subdivision (d) of Section 14154.

(ii) Applications for children who are not granted accelerated enrollment by the SPE due to the existence of an already active Medi-Cal case shall be processed according to the timeframes specified in subdivision (d) of Section 14154.

(iii) For applications for children who are not described in clause (i) or (ii), 90 percent shall be processed within 10 working days of being received, complete and without client errors.

(iv) If an application described in this section also contains adults, and the adult applicants are required to submit additional information beyond the information provided for the children, the county shall process the eligibility for the child or children without delay, consistent with this section while gathering the necessary information to process eligibility
 for the adults.

(B) The department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, shall develop reporting requirements for the counties to provide regular data to the state regarding the timeliness and outcomes of applications processed by the counties that are received from the SPE.

(C) Performance thresholds and corrective action standards as set forth in Section 14154 shall apply.

(D) For applications received directly by the county, these applications shall be processed by the counties in accordance with the performance standards established under subdivision (d) of Section 14154.

(3) This subdivision shall be implemented no sooner than January 1, 2013.

(4) Twelve
 months after implementation of this section pursuant to subdivision (e), the department shall provide enrollment information regarding individuals determined eligible pursuant to subdivision (a) to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(o) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, for purposes of this transition, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. It is the intent of the Legislature that the department be allowed temporary authority as necessary to implement program changes until completion of the regulatory process.

(2) To the extent
 otherwise required by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this section no later than July 1, 2014. The department may thereafter readopt the emergency regulations pursuant to that chapter. The adoption and readoption, by the department, of regulations implementing this section shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(p) To implement this section, the department may enter into and continue contracts with the Healthy Families Program administrative vendor, for the purposes of implementing and
 maintaining the necessary systems and activities for providing health care coverage to optional targeted low-income children in the Medi-Cal program for purposes of accelerated enrollment application processing by single point of entry, noneligibility-related case maintenance and premium collection, maintenance of the Health-E-App web portal, call center staffing and operations, certified application assistant services, and reporting capabilities. To further implement this section, the department may also enter into a contract with the Health Care Options Broker of the department for purposes of managed care enrollment activities. The contracts entered into or amended under this section may initially be completed on a noncompetitive bid basis and are exempt from the Public Contract Code. Contracts thereafter shall be entered into or amended on a competitive bid basis and shall be subject to the Public Contract Code.

(q) (1) If at any time the director determines that this section or any part of this section may jeopardize the state’s ability to receive federal financial participation under the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), or any amendment or extension of that act, or any additional federal funds that the director, in consultation with the Department of Finance, determines would be advantageous to the state, the director shall give notice to the fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature and to the Department of Finance. After giving notice, this section or any part of this section shall become inoperative on the date that the director executes a declaration stating that the department has determined, in consultation with the Department of Finance, that it is necessary to cease to implement this section or a part or parts thereof in order to receive federal financial participation, any increase in the federal medical assistance percentage available on or after
 October 1, 2008, or any additional federal funds that the director, in consultation with the Department of Finance, has determined would be advantageous to the state.

(2) The director shall retain the declaration described in paragraph (1), shall provide a copy of the declaration to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, and the Legislative Counsel, and shall post the declaration on the department’s internet website.

(3) In the event that the director makes a determination under paragraph (1) and this section ceases to be implemented, the children shall be enrolled back into the Healthy Families Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 51.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (q).)
-------------------------------------------

14005.271.

(a) The Healthy Families Advisory Board established by former Section 12693.90 of the Insurance Code is hereby renamed the Medi-Cal Children’s Health Advisory Panel.

(b) The Medi-Cal Children’s Health Advisory Panel shall be an independent, statewide advisory board that shall advise the State Department of Health Care Services on matters relevant to all children enrolled in Medi-Cal and their families, including, but not limited to, emerging trends in the care of children, quality measurements, communications between the State Department of Health Care Services and Medi-Cal families, provider network issues, and Medi-Cal enrollment issues.

(c) The membership of the advisory panel shall be composed
 of the following 15 members:

(1) One member who is a licensed, practicing dentist.

(2) One physician and surgeon who is board certified in the area of family practice medicine.

(3) One physician and surgeon who is board certified in pediatrics.

(4) One representative from a licensed nonprofit primary care clinic.

(5) One representative from the mental health provider community.

(6) One representative of the substance abuse provider community.

(7) One
 representative of the county public health provider community.

(8) One representative from a licensed hospital that is on the disproportionate share list maintained by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(9) A current or former foster youth; an attorney, social worker, probation officer, or court appointed special advocate who currently represents one or more foster youth; a foster care service provider; or a child welfare advocate.

(10) Three
 members, each of whom is either a Medi-Cal enrollee who has received Medi-Cal benefits or services in relation to a pregnancy, including, but not limited to, benefits or services received through the Medi-Cal Access Program, or is a parent, foster parent, relative caregiver, or legal guardian of a Medi-Cal enrollee who is 21 years of age or younger.

(11) One representative from the health plan community.

(12) One representative from the business community.

(13) One representative from the education community.

(d) The advisory panel shall elect, from among its members, its chair. In order to coordinate the activities of the advisory panel with other advisory bodies
 whose scope includes children enrolled in Medi-Cal, the chair shall keep apprised of relevant Medi-Cal stakeholder meetings by communicating with State Department of Health Care Services staff assisting the advisory panel.

(e) The advisory panel members shall be appointed by the State Department of Health Care Services, or in the case of vacancies of three months or greater, by the chair.

(f) A member of the advisory panel appointed on or after January 1, 2018, shall serve a term of
 three years, commencing upon the expiration of the predecessor member’s term, except that a member appointed to fill a vacancy caused by any reason other than expiration of the predecessor member’s term shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term.

(g) Members of the advisory panel appointed prior to January 1, 2018, shall, by lot, designate five members of the panel who shall end their terms on
 December 31, 2018, five members who shall end their terms on December 31, 2019, and five members who shall end their terms on December 31, 2020.

(h) An advisory panel member may be removed by the State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with the chair, if the removal is
 determined to be necessary by the Director of Health Care Services. The chair may recommend removal of a member of the advisory panel for cause if the member obstructs the function of the advisory panel. For the purpose of this subdivision, “obstruction of the function of the advisory panel” includes, but is not limited to, the failure of a
 member to attend two consecutive meetings of the advisory panel. 

(i) The chair shall immediately notify the State Department of Health Care Services upon the occurrence of a vacancy on the advisory panel. For the purposes of this subdivision, a vacancy shall not exist solely because a panel member ceases to meet the qualifications of the provision pursuant to which the member was appointed.

(j) The advisory panel’s powers and duties include, but are not limited to, both of the following:

(1) To advise the Director of Health Care Services on all policies, regulations, and operations of the Medi-Cal program related to providing health care services to children.

(2) To meet at least quarterly, unless deemed unnecessary by the chair.

(k) The State Department of Health Care Services’ powers and duties shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) To provide general support and staff assistance to the advisory panel.

(2) To convene and attend meetings of the advisory panel at least quarterly, unless deemed unnecessary by the chair, at locations that are easily accessible to the public and advisory panel members, are of sufficient duration for presentation, discussion, and public comment on each agenda item, and are in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(3) To reimburse the members of the
 advisory panel for all necessary travel expenses associated with the activities of the advisory panel, and to provide a stipend of one hundred dollars ($100) per meeting attended to each panel member who is a Medi-Cal enrollee or a parent, foster parent, relative caregiver, or legal guardian of a Medi-Cal enrollee.

(4) To maintain an Internet Web page on the department’s Internet Web site dedicated to the advisory panel that shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The purpose and scope of the advisory panel.

(B) The current
 membership of the advisory panel.

(C) A list of past and future meetings.

(D) Agendas and other materials made available for past and future meetings.

(E) Recommendations submitted to the department by the advisory panel.

(F) The department’s responses to recommendations submitted by the advisory panel.

(G) Contact information for department staff assisting the advisory panel.

(5) To inform advisory panel members when new information is posted to the Internet Web page dedicated to the advisory panel.

(6) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, to submit on or before January 1, 2018, a report to the Legislature on the advisory panel’s accomplishments, effectiveness, efficiency, and any recommendations for statutory changes needed to improve the ability of the advisory panel to fulfill its purpose. The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(l) The Legislature does not intend the addition of this section to result in a new panel, but rather a continuation of the prior
 panel established by former Section 12693.90 of the Insurance Code. New panel members shall not be appointed until a vacancy occurs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 280, Sec. 1.   (SB 220)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.275.

The department shall ensure coordination of covered services across all delivery systems of care in order to minimize disruption in services for children transitioning from the Healthy Families Program to Medi-Cal pursuant to Chapter 28 of the Statutes of 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 54.5.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.277.

In order to assist the California Health Benefit Exchange, established pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code, to conduct outreach to individuals potentially eligible for an insurance affordability program, as defined in Section 15926, the department shall provide the California Health Benefit Exchange, or its designee, with the names, addresses, email addresses, telephone numbers, or other contact information, and written and spoken languages of
 individuals who are not enrolled in Medi-Cal but are the parents or caretakers of children enrolled in the Healthy Families Program or the Medi-Cal program pursuant to Section 14005.27.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 448, Sec. 3.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.28.

(a) To the extent federal financial participation is available pursuant to an approved state plan amendment, the department shall implement Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(IX) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(IX)) to provide Medi-Cal benefits to an individual until his or her 26th birthday if he or she was in foster care on his or her 18th birthday, or such higher age the
 state has elected under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.). In addition, the department shall implement the federal option to provide Medi-Cal benefits to individuals who were in foster care and enrolled in Medicaid in any state.

(1) A foster care adolescent who was in foster care in this state on his or her 18th birthday, or such higher age the state has elected under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.), shall be enrolled to receive benefits under this section without any interruption in coverage and without requiring a new application.

(2) The department shall develop procedures to identify and enroll individuals who meet the criteria for Medi-Cal eligibility in this subdivision, including, but not limited to, former foster care adolescents who were in foster care on their 18th birthday and who lost
 Medi-Cal coverage as a result of attaining 21 years of age. The department shall work with counties to identify and conduct outreach to former foster care adolescents who lost Medi-Cal coverage during the 2013 calendar year as a result of attaining 21 years of age, to ensure they are aware of the ability to reenroll under the coverage provided pursuant to this section.

(3) (A) The department shall develop and implement a simplified redetermination form for this program. A beneficiary qualifying for the benefits extended pursuant to this section shall fill out and return this form only if information known to the department is no longer accurate or is materially incomplete.

(B) The department shall seek federal approval to institute a renewal process that allows a beneficiary receiving benefits under this section to remain on Medi-Cal after a redetermination
 form is returned as undeliverable and the county is otherwise unable to establish contact. If federal approval is granted, the recipient shall remain eligible for services under the Medi-Cal fee-for-service program until the time contact is reestablished or ineligibility is established, and to the extent federal financial participation is available.

(C) The department shall terminate eligibility only after it determines that the recipient is no longer eligible and all due process requirements are met in accordance with state and federal law.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time any necessary regulations are adopted.
 The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2017, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months after the effective date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations have been adopted.

(c) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 831, Sec. 4.   (SB 508)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.285.

(a) To the extent federal financial participation is available pursuant to an approved state plan amendment, the department shall exercise its option under Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XVII) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XVII)) to extend Medi-Cal benefits to independent foster care adolescents, as defined in Section 1905(w)(1) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(w)(1)).

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time any necessary regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2017, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months after the effective date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations have been adopted.

(c) This section shall be implemented only to the
 extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 831, Sec. 5.   (SB 508)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.287.

(a) To the extent federal financial participation is available pursuant to an approved state plan amendment, the department shall exercise its option under Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(I) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(I)) to extend Medi-Cal benefits to individuals under 21 years of age placed in foster homes or private institutions for whom a public agency is assuming full or partial financial responsibility.

(b) Pursuant to Section 1902(r)(2) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(r)(2)), all of the income considered when determining an individual’s eligibility under this section shall be disregarded.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time any necessary regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2017, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal
 financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 831, Sec. 6.   (SB 508)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.288.

(a) To the extent federal financial participation is available pursuant to an approved state plan amendment, the department shall exercise its option under Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(VIII) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(VIII)) to extend Medi-Cal benefits to individuals under 21 years of age for whom an adoption agreement, other than an agreement under Title IV–E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 671 et seq.),
 between the state and the adoptive parent or parents is in effect.

(b) Pursuant to Section 1902(r)(2) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(r)(2)), all of the income considered when determining an individual’s eligibility under this section shall be disregarded.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time any necessary regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2017, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 831, Sec. 7.   (SB 508)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.29.

To the extent that federal matching funds are available, disabled persons who are otherwise eligible for benefits under this chapter, except for income due to employment, shall continue to be eligible to receive benefits for conditions excluded from coverage by a private insurer, provided those persons’ incomes do not exceed 200 percent of the income level for maintenance established pursuant to Section 14005.12.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 883, Sec. 1.)